Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,242
Department, defined.

Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 151;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 439.